test/src/morphology/izh-test-A-kalakas.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Adjective - kalakas: # Adjective 'with plenty of fish'
     kalakas+N+Sg+Nom: kalakas
     kalakas+N+Sg+Gen: kalakkaan
     kalakas+N+Sg+Acc: kalakkaan
     kalakas+N+Sg+Part: kalakasta
     kalakas+N+Sg+Ill: kalakkaasse
     kalakas+N+Sg+Ine: kalakkaas
     kalakas+N+Sg+Ela: kalakkaast
     kalakas+N+Sg+All: kalakkaalle
     kalakas+N+Sg+Ade: kalakkaal
     kalakas+N+Sg+Abl: kalakkaalt
     kalakas+N+Sg+Tra: kalakkaaks
     kalakas+N+Sg+Ess: kalakkaanna
     kalakas+N+Sg+Exe: kalakkaant

     kalakas+N+Pl+Nom: kalakkaat
     kalakas+N+Pl+Gen: kalakkain
     kalakas+N+Pl+Acc: kalakkaat
     kalakas+N+Pl+Part: kalakkaita
     kalakas+N+Pl+Ill: kalakkaisse
     kalakas+N+Pl+Ine: kalakkais
     kalakas+N+Pl+Ela: kalakkaist
     kalakas+N+Pl+All: kalakkaille
     kalakas+N+Pl+Ade: kalakkail
     kalakas+N+Pl+Abl: kalakkailt
     kalakas+N+Pl+Tra: kalakkaiks
     kalakas+N+Pl+Ess: kalakkainna
     kalakas+N+Pl+Exe: kalakkaint
